Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.420

RCW 9.46.410 to be negotiated with Indian tribes.

The commission shall consider the provisions of RCW 9.46.410 as elements to be negotiated with federally recognized Indian tribes as provided in RCW 9.46.360.

[ 2002 c 252 s 3.]